Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-1,128
Emergency; closing; notice; contents.

A financial institution closing an office pursuant to the authority granted under section 8-1,126 shall give as prompt notice of its action as conditions will permit and by any means available, to the director.

Laws 1971, LB 523, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 120.